Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 5. Offenses Involving Property Rights.

Sec. 28.35.300.
Tampering with or damaging a vehicle.

A person, without the right to do so, may not tamper with a vehicle, set or attempt to set a vehicle in motion, or damage a part or component of a vehicle.

History.

(§ 5 ch 241 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.35.015

.
Renumbered in 2006.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, §§ 394, 395.

61A C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 1690.

Validity and construction of statute making it a criminal offense to “tamper” with motor vehicle or contents, or to obscure registration plates, 57 A.L.R.3d 606.

Construction and application of statute making it unlawful to tamper with motor vehicle odometer, 76 A.L.R.3d 981.

Sec. 28.35.310.
Renting a motor vehicle.

A person may not rent a motor vehicle to a person unless the person renting the vehicle is properly licensed under this title or, if a nonresident, the person is properly licensed under the laws of the jurisdiction of a person’s residence.

A person may not rent a motor vehicle until the person has inspected the license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented, and has verified the identification of the licensee.

Every person renting a motor vehicle shall keep a record of the registration number of the vehicle rented, the name, address and license number of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, and the date and place when and where the license of the intended driver was issued. The record shall be open to inspection by a peace officer or employee of the Department of Public Safety acting in an official capacity.

Every person renting a motor vehicle shall comply with the financial responsibility requirements of this title.

A person who rents motor vehicles to others shall provide child safety devices in sufficient quantity that all persons to whom the vehicles are to be rented can comply with the requirements of AS

28.05.095

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 241 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 99 § 55 (1997))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.35.024

.
Renumbered in 2006.

Collateral references. —

61A C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 1678 et seq.

Sec. 28.35.320.
Failure to return rental vehicle.

A person in possession of a motor vehicle under an agreement in writing that requires the person to return the vehicle to a particular place or at a particular time who refuses or wilfully neglects to return it to the place and at the time specified in the agreement in writing with the intent to deprive the owner of the vehicle or to convert it to the person’s own use, or who secretes, converts, sells, or attempts to sell the vehicle or any part of it is, upon conviction, punishable by imprisonment for not more than five years, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

In this section, “wilfully neglects” means omits, fails, or forbears, with a conscious purpose to injure, or without regard for the rights of the owner, or with indifference whether a wrong is done the owner or not.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1964; am § 18 ch 144 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.35.026

.
Renumbered in 2006.